Utah statutes.
78B-8-506.   Payment of expenses awarded -- Statement required in agency's
budget.
Expenses awarded under this part shall be paid from funds in the regular
operating budget of the state entity. If sufficient funds are not available in
the budget of the entity, the expenses shall be considered a claim governed by
the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 9, Board of Examiners Act.  Every state
entity against which litigation expenses have been awarded under this part
shall, at the time of submission of its proposed budget, submit a report to
the governmental body which appropriates its funds in which the amount of
expenses awarded and paid under this act during the fiscal year is stated.
